Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-817
Authority; quorum; actions; vacancy; effect; meetings.

Four members of the authority shall constitute a quorum. The affirmative vote of a majority of all of the members of the authority shall be necessary for any action taken by the authority. A vacancy in the membership of the authority shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority. Any action taken by the authority under the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and each such resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be published or posted. Members of the authority may participate in a regular or special meeting of the authority by virtual conferencing as long as the chairperson or vice-chairperson conducts the meeting at a location where the public is able to participate by attendance at that location and the virtual conferencing otherwise conforms to the requirements of section 84-1411.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 14;

Laws 1984, LB 644, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2914;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1714;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 17;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 11;

Laws 2021, LB83, § 7;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 67.